Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. ORGANIZATION OF MUNICIPAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE C. MUNICIPAL BOUNDARIES AND ANNEXATION

CHAPTER 42. EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION OF MUNICIPALITIES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 42.001. PURPOSE OF EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION. The legislature declares it the policy of the state to designate certain areas as the extraterritorial jurisdiction of municipalities to promote and protect the general health, safety, and welfare of persons residing in and adjacent to the municipalities.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER B. DETERMINATION OF EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION

Sec. 42.021. EXTENT OF EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION. (a) The extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality is the unincorporated area that is contiguous to the corporate boundaries of the municipality and that is located:

(1) within one-half mile of those boundaries, in the case of a municipality with fewer than 5,000 inhabitants;

(2) within one mile of those boundaries, in the case of a municipality with 5,000 to 24,999 inhabitants;

(3) within two miles of those boundaries, in the case of a municipality with 25,000 to 49,999 inhabitants;

(4) within 3-1/2 miles of those boundaries, in the case of a municipality with 50,000 to 99,999 inhabitants; or

(5) within five miles of those boundaries, in the case of a municipality with 100,000 or more inhabitants.

(b) Regardless of Subsection (a), the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality is the unincorporated area that is contiguous to the corporate boundaries of the municipality and that is located:

(1) within five miles of those boundaries on a barrier island; or

(2) within one-half mile of those boundaries off a barrier island.

(c) Subsection (b) applies to a municipality that has:

(1) a population of 2,000 or more; and

(2) territory located:

(A) entirely on a barrier island in the Gulf of Mexico; and

(B) within 30 miles of an international border.

(d) Regardless of Subsection (a), the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality is the unincorporated area that is contiguous to the corporate boundaries of the municipality and that is located within three miles of those boundaries if the municipality:

(1) has a population of not less than 25,000 or more than 27,000; and

(2) is located in a county that has a population of 45,000 or more and borders the Trinity River.

(e) An annexation commenced after January 1, 2023, does not expand the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality unless contemporaneously with the annexation the owner or owners of the area that would be included in the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction as a result of the annexation request that the area be included in the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 761 (H.B. 3325), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 215 (H.B. 91), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 612 (S.B. 508), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(33), eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 106 (S.B. 2038), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 121, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 42.022. EXPANSION OF EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION. (a) When a municipality annexes an area, the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality expands with the annexation to comprise, consistent with Section 42.021, the area around the new municipal boundaries.

(b) The extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality may expand beyond the distance limitations imposed by Section 42.021 to include an area contiguous to the otherwise existing extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality if the owners of the area request the expansion.

(c) The expansion of the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality through annexation, request, or increase in the number of inhabitants may not include any area in the existing extraterritorial jurisdiction of another municipality, except as provided by Subsection (d).

(d) The extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality may be expanded through annexation to include area that on the date of annexation is located in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of another municipality if a written agreement between the municipalities in effect on the date of annexation allocates the area to the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the annexing municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 337 (H.B. 2902), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 42.0225. EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION AROUND CERTAIN MUNICIPALLY OWNED PROPERTY. (a) This section applies only to an area owned by a municipality that is:

(1) annexed by the municipality; and

(2) not contiguous to other territory of the municipality.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 42.021, the annexation of an area described by Subsection (a) does not expand the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1167, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 42.023. REDUCTION OF EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION. The extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality may not be reduced unless the governing body of the municipality gives its written consent by ordinance or resolution, except:

(1) in cases of judicial apportionment of overlapping extraterritorial jurisdictions under Section 42.901;

(2) in accordance with an agreement under Section 42.022(d); or

(3) as necessary to comply with Section 42.0235.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 337 (H.B. 2902), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 941 (H.B. 4059), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2015.

Sec. 42.0235. LIMITATION ON EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION OF CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES. (a) Notwithstanding Section 42.021, and except as provided by Subsection (d), the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality with a population of more than 175,000 located in a county that contains an international border and borders the Gulf of Mexico terminates two miles from the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a neighboring municipality if extension of the extraterritorial jurisdiction beyond that limit would:

(1) completely surround the corporate boundaries or extraterritorial jurisdiction of the neighboring municipality; and

(2) limit the growth of the neighboring municipality by precluding the expansion of the neighboring municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction.

(b) A municipality shall release extraterritorial jurisdiction as necessary to comply with Subsection (a).

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a municipality that owns an electric system and that releases extraterritorial jurisdiction under Subsection (b) may provide electric service in the released area to the same extent that the service would have been provided if the municipality had annexed the area.

(d) Extraterritorial jurisdiction for a municipality subject to this section is determined under Section 42.021 if the governing body of the municipality and the governing body of the neighboring municipality each adopt, on or after June 1, 2017, resolutions stating that the determination of extraterritorial jurisdiction under Section 42.0235(a) is not in the best interest of the municipality.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 941 (H.B. 4059), Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 447 (S.B. 468), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 42.024. TRANSFER OF EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION BETWEEN CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Adopting municipality" means a home-rule municipality with a population of less than 25,000 that purchases and appropriates raw water for its water utility through a transbasin diversion permit from one or two river authorities in which the municipality has territory.

(2) "Releasing municipality" means a home-rule municipality with a population of more than 450,000 that owns an electric utility, that has a charter provision allowing for limited-purpose annexation, and that has annexed territory for a limited purpose.

(b) The governing body of an adopting municipality may by resolution include in its extraterritorial jurisdiction an area that is in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a releasing municipality if:

(1) the releasing municipality does not provide water, sewer services, and electricity to the released area;

(2) the owners of a majority of the land within the released area request that the adopting municipality include in its extraterritorial jurisdiction the released area;

(3) the released area is:

(A) adjacent to the territory of the adopting municipality;

(B) wholly within a county in which both municipalities have territory; and

(C) located in one or more school districts, each of which has the majority of its territory outside the territory of the releasing municipality;

(4) the adopting municipality adopts ordinances or regulations within the released area for water quality standards relating to the control or abatement of water pollution that are in conformity with those of the Texas Natural Resource Conservation Commission applicable to the released area on January 1, 1995;

(5) the adopting municipality has adopted a service plan to provide water and sewer service to the area acceptable to the owners of a majority of the land within the released area; and

(6) the size of the released area does not exceed the difference between the total area within the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the adopting municipality, exclusive of the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the releasing municipality, on the date the resolution was adopted under this subsection, as determined by Section 42.021, and the total area within the adopting municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction on the date of the resolution.

(c)(1) The service plan under Subsection (b)(5) shall include an assessment of the availability and feasibility of participation in any regional facility permitted by the Texas Natural Resource Conservation Commission in which the releasing municipality is a participant and had plans to provide service to the released area. The plan for regional service shall include:

(A) proposed dates for providing sewer service through the regional facility;

(B) terms of financial participation to provide sewer service to the released area, including rates proposed for service sufficient to reimburse the regional participants over a reasonable time for any expenditures associated with that portion of the regional facility designed or constructed to serve the released area as of January 1, 1993; and

(C) participation by the adopting municipality in governance of the regional facility based on the percentage of land to be served by the regional facility in the released area compared to the total land area to be served by the regional facility.

(2) The adopting municipality shall deliver a copy of the service plan to the releasing municipality and any other participant in any regional facility described in this subsection at least 30 days before the resolution to assume extraterritorial jurisdiction. The releasing municipality and any other participant in any regional facility described in this subsection by resolution shall, within 30 days of delivery of the service plan, either accept that portion of the service plan related to participation by the adopting municipality in the regional facility or propose alternative terms of participation.

(3) If the adopting municipality, the releasing municipality, and any other participant in any regional facility described in this subsection fail to reach agreement on the service plan within 60 days after the service plan is delivered, any municipality that is a participant in the regional facility or any owner of land within the area to be released may appeal the matter to the Texas Natural Resource Conservation Commission. The Texas Natural Resource Conservation Commission shall, in its resolution of any differences between proposals submitted for review in this subsection, use a cost-of-service allocation methodology which treats each service unit in the regional facility equally, with any variance in rates to be based only on differences in costs based on the time service is provided to an area served by the regional facility. The Texas Natural Resource Conservation Commission may allow the adopting municipality, the releasing municipality, or any other participant in any regional facility described in this subsection to withdraw from participation in the regional facility on a showing of undue financial hardship.

(4) A decision by the Texas Natural Resource Conservation Commission under this subsection is not subject to judicial review, and any costs associated with the commission's review shall be assessed to the parties to the decision in proportion to the percentage of land served by the regional facility subject to review in the jurisdiction of each party.

(5) The releasing municipality shall not, prior to January 1, 1997, discontinue or terminate any interlocal agreement, contract, or commitment relating to water or sewer service that it has as of January 1, 1995, with the adopting municipality without the consent of the adopting municipality.

(d) On the date the adopting municipality delivers a copy of the resolution under Subsection (b) to the municipal clerk of the releasing municipality, the released area shall be included in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the adopting municipality and excluded from the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the releasing municipality.

(e) If any part of a tract of land, owned either in fee simple or under common control or undivided ownership, was or becomes split, before or after the dedication or deed of a portion of the land for a public purpose, between the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a releasing municipality and the jurisdiction of another municipality, or is land described in Subsection (b)(3)(C), the authority to act under Chapter 212 and the authority to regulate development and building with respect to the tract of land is, on the request of the owner to the municipality, with the municipality selected by the owner of the tract of land. The municipality selected under this subsection may also provide or authorize another person or entity to provide municipal services to land subject to this subsection.

(f) Nothing in this section requires the releasing municipality to continue to participate in a regional wastewater treatment plant providing service, or to provide new services, to any territory within the released area.

(g) This section controls over any conflicting provision of this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 766, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 42.025. RELEASE OF EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION BY CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES. (a) In this section, "eligible property" means any portion of a contiguous tract of land:

(1) that is located in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality within one-half mile of the territory of a proposed municipal airport;

(2) for which a contract for land acquisition services was awarded by the municipality; and

(3) that has not been acquired through the contract described by Subdivision (2) for the proposed municipal airport.

(b) The owner of eligible property may petition the municipality to release the property from the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction not later than June 1, 1996. The petition must be filed with the secretary or clerk of the municipality.

(c) Not later than the 10th day after the date the secretary or clerk receives a petition under Subsection (b), the municipality by resolution shall release the eligible property from the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality.

(d) Eligible property that is released from the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality under Subsection (c) may be included in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of another municipality if:

(1) any part of the other municipality is located in the same county as the property; and

(2) the other municipality and the owner agree to the inclusion of the property in the extraterritorial jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 788, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1995. Renumbered from Local Government Code Sec. 42.024 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 31.01(64), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 42.0251. RELEASE OF EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION BY CERTAIN GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITIES. (a) This section applies only to a general-law municipality:

(1) that has a population of less than 4,000;

(2) that is located in a county with a population of more than 800,000 that is adjacent to a county with a population of more than four million; and

(3) in which at least two-thirds of the residents reside within a gated community.

(b) A municipality shall release an area from its extraterritorial jurisdiction not later than the 10th day after the date the municipality receives a petition requesting that the area be released that is signed by at least 80 percent of the owners of real property located in the area requesting release.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 337 (H.B. 2902), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 122, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 42.026. LIMITATION ON EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION OF CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES. (a) In this section, "navigable stream" has the meaning assigned by Section 21.001, Natural Resources Code.

(b) This section applies only to an area that is:

(1) located in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a home-rule municipality that has a population of 60,000 or less and is located in whole or in part in a county with a population of 240,000 or less;

(2) located outside the county in which a majority of the land area of the municipality is located; and

(3) separated from the municipality's corporate boundaries by a navigable stream.

(c) A municipality that, on August 31, 1999, includes that area in its extraterritorial jurisdiction shall, before January 1, 2000:

(1) adopt an ordinance removing that area from the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction; or

(2) enter into an agreement with a municipality located in the county in which that area is located to transfer that area to the extraterritorial jurisdiction of that municipality.

(d) If the municipality that is required to act under Subsection (c) does not do so as provided by that subsection, the area is automatically removed from the extraterritorial jurisdiction of that municipality on January 1, 2000.

(e) Section 42.021 does not apply to a transfer of extraterritorial jurisdiction under Subsection (c)(2).

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1494, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER C. CREATION OR EXPANSION OF GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES IN EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION

Sec. 42.041. MUNICIPAL INCORPORATION IN EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION GENERALLY. (a) A municipality may not be incorporated in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of an existing municipality unless the governing body of the existing municipality gives its written consent by ordinance or resolution.

(b) If the governing body of the existing municipality refuses to give its consent, a majority of the qualified voters of the area of the proposed municipality and the owners of at least 50 percent of the land in the proposed municipality may petition the governing body to annex the area. If the governing body fails or refuses to annex the area within six months after the date it receives the petition, that failure or refusal constitutes the governing body's consent to the incorporation of the proposed municipality.

(c) The consent to the incorporation of the proposed municipality is only an authorization to initiate incorporation proceedings as provided by law.

(d) If the consent to initiate incorporation proceedings is obtained, the incorporation must be initiated within six months after the date of the consent and must be finally completed within 18 months after the date of the consent. Failure to comply with either time requirement terminates the consent.

(e) This section applies only to the proposed municipality's area located in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the existing municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 287 (H.B. 585), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2005.

For expiration of Subsections (c) and (d), see Subsections (c) and (d).

Sec. 42.0411. MUNICIPAL INCORPORATION IN EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION OF CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES. (a) This section applies only to:

(1) an area located north and east of Interstate Highway 10 that is included in the extraterritorial jurisdiction, or the limited-purpose annexation area, of a municipality with a population of one million or more that has operated under a three-year annexation plan similar to the municipal annexation plan described by Section 43.052 for at least 10 years; or

(2) an area located north and east of Interstate Highway 10:

(A) that is included in the extraterritorial jurisdiction, or the limited-purpose annexation area, of a municipality with a population of one million or more that has operated under a three-year annexation plan similar to the municipal annexation plan described by Section 43.052 for at least 10 years;

(B) that has not been included in the municipality's annexation plan described by Section 43.052 before the 180th day before the date consent for incorporation is requested under Section 42.041(a); and

(C) for which the municipality refused to give its consent to incorporation under Section 42.041(a).

(b) The residents of the area described by Subsection (a)(2) may initiate an attempt to incorporate as a municipality by filing a written petition signed by at least 10 percent of the registered voters of the area of the proposed municipality with the county judge of the county in which the proposed municipality is located. The petition must request the county judge to order an election to determine whether the area of the proposed municipality will incorporate. An incorporation election under this section shall be conducted in the same manner as an incorporation election under Subchapter A, Chapter 8. The consent of the municipality that previously refused to give consent is not required for the incorporation.

(c) In this subsection, "deferred annexation area" means an area that has entered into an agreement with a municipality under which the municipality defers annexation of the area for at least 10 years. An area described by Subsection (a)(1) that is located within 1-1/2 miles of a municipality's deferred annexation area or adjacent to the corporate boundaries of the municipality may not be annexed for limited or full purposes during the period provided under the agreement. During the period provided under the agreement, the residents of the area may incorporate in accordance with the incorporation proceedings provided by law, except that the consent of the municipality is not required for the incorporation. This subsection expires on the later of:

(1) September 1, 2009; or

(2) the date that all areas entitled to incorporate under this subsection have incorporated.

(d) This subsection applies only to an area that is described by Subsection (a)(1) and removed from a municipality's annexation plan under Section 43.052(e) two times or more. The residents of the area and any adjacent territory that is located within the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality or located within an area annexed for limited purposes by the municipality and that is adjacent to the corporate boundaries of the municipality may incorporate in accordance with the incorporation proceedings provided by law, except that the consent of the municipality is not required for the incorporation. This subsection expires on the later of:

(1) September 1, 2009; or

(2) the date that all areas entitled to incorporate under this subsection have incorporated.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 287 (H.B. 585), Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2005.

Sec. 42.042. CREATION OF POLITICAL SUBDIVISION TO SUPPLY WATER OR SEWER SERVICES, ROADWAYS, OR DRAINAGE FACILITIES IN EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION. (a) A political subdivision, one purpose of which is to supply fresh water for domestic or commercial use or to furnish sanitary sewer services, roadways, or drainage, may not be created in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality unless the governing body of the municipality gives its written consent by ordinance or resolution in accordance with this subsection and the Water Code. In giving its consent, the municipality may not place any conditions or other restrictions on the creation of the political subdivision other than those expressly permitted by Sections 54.016(e) and (i), Water Code.

(b) If the governing body fails or refuses to give its consent for the creation of the political subdivision, including a water district previously created by an act of the legislature, on mutually agreeable terms within 90 days after the date the governing body receives a written request for the consent, a majority of the qualified voters of the area of the proposed political subdivision and the owners of at least 50 percent of the land in the proposed political subdivision may petition the governing body to make available to the area the water, sanitary sewer services, or both that would be provided by the political subdivision.

(c) If, within 120 days after the date the governing body receives the petition, the governing body fails to make a contract with a majority of the qualified voters of the area of the proposed political subdivision and the owners of at least 50 percent of the land in the proposed political subdivision to provide the services, that failure constitutes the governing body's consent to the creation of the proposed political subdivision.

(d) The consent to the creation of the political subdivision is only an authorization to initiate proceedings to create the political subdivision as provided by law.

(e) Repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1070, Sec. 55, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

(f) If the municipality fails or refuses to give its consent to the creation of the political subdivision, including a water district previously created by an act of the legislature, or fails or refuses to execute a contract providing for the water or sanitary sewer services requested within the time limits prescribed by this section, the applicant may petition the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality for the creation of the political subdivision or the inclusion of the land in a political subdivision. The commission shall allow creation or confirmation of the creation of the political subdivision or inclusion of the land in a proposed political subdivision on finding that the municipality either does not have the reasonable ability to serve or has failed to make a legally binding commitment with sufficient funds available to provide water and wastewater service adequate to serve the proposed development at a reasonable cost to the landowner. The commitment must provide that construction of the facilities necessary to serve the land will begin within two years and will be substantially completed within 4-1/2 years after the date the petition was filed with the municipality.

(g) On an appeal taken to the district court from the ruling of the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality, all parties to the commission hearing must be made parties to the appeal. The court shall hear the appeal within 120 days after the date the appeal is filed. If the case is continued or appealed to a higher court beyond the 120-day period, the court shall require the appealing party or party requesting the continuance to post a bond or other adequate security in the amount of damages that may be incurred by any party as a result of the appeal or delay from the commission action. The amount of the bond or other security shall be determined by the court after notice and hearing. On final disposition, a court may award damages, including any damages for delays, attorney's fees, and costs of court to the prevailing party.

(h) A municipality may not unilaterally extend the time limits prescribed by this section through the adoption of preapplication periods or by passage of any rules, resolutions, ordinances, or charter provisions. However, the municipality and the petitioner may jointly petition the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality to request an extension of the time limits.

(i) Repealed by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1058, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

(j) The consent requirements of this section do not apply to the creation of a special utility district under Chapter 65, Water Code. If a special utility district is to be converted to a district with taxing authority that provides utility services, this section applies to the conversion.

(k) This section, except Subsection (i), applies only to the proposed political subdivision's area located in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 3(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1058, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 11.254, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1098 (H.B. 3378), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1128 (H.B. 2590), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 42.0425. ADDITION OF LAND IN EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION OF MUNICIPALITY TO CERTAIN POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS. (a) A political subdivision, one purpose of which is to supply fresh water for domestic or commercial use or to furnish sanitary sewer services, roadways, or drainage, may not add land that is located in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality unless the governing body of the municipality gives its written consent by ordinance or resolution in accordance with this section and the Water Code. In giving its consent, the municipality may not place any conditions or other restrictions on the expansion of the political subdivision other than those expressly permitted by Section 54.016(e), Water Code.

(b) The procedures under Section 42.042 governing a municipality's refusal to consent to the creation of a political subdivision apply to a municipality that refuses to consent to the addition of land to a political subdivision under this section.

(c) An owner of land in the area proposed to be added to the political subdivision may not unreasonably refuse to enter into a contract for water or sanitary sewer services with the municipality under Section 42.042(c).

(d) This section does not apply to a political subdivision created by Chapter 289, Acts of the 73rd Legislature, Regular Session, 1993.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 703 (H.B. 2091), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 42.043. REQUIREMENTS APPLYING TO PETITION. (a) A petition under Section 42.041 or 42.042 must:

(1) be written;

(2) request that the area be annexed or that the services be made available, as appropriate;

(3) be signed in ink or indelible pencil by the appropriate voters and landowners;

(4) be signed, in the case of a person signing as a voter, as the person's name appears on the most recent official list of registered voters;

(5) contain, in the case of a person signing as a voter, a note made by the person stating the person's residence address and the precinct number and voter registration number that appear on the person's voter registration certificate;

(6) contain, in the case of a person signing as a landowner, a note made by the person opposite the person's name stating the approximate total acreage that the person owns in the area to be annexed or serviced;

(7) describe the area to be annexed or serviced and have a plat of the area attached; and

(8) be presented to the secretary or clerk of the municipality.

(b) The signatures to the petition need not be appended to one paper.

(c) Before the petition is circulated among the voters and landowners, notice of the petition must be given by posting a copy of the petition for 10 days in three public places in the area to be annexed or serviced and by publishing the notice once, in a newspaper of general circulation serving the area, before the 15th day before the date the petition is first circulated. Proof of posting and publication must be made by attaching to the petition presented to the secretary or clerk:

(1) the affidavit of any voter who signed the petition, stating the places and dates of the posting;

(2) the affidavit of the publisher of the newspaper in which the notice was published, stating the name of the newspaper and the issue and date of publication; and

(3) the affidavit of at least three voters who signed the petition, if there are that many, stating the total number of voters residing in the area and the approximate total acreage in the area.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 42.044. CREATION OF INDUSTRIAL DISTRICT IN EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION. (a) In this section, "industrial district" has the meaning customarily given to the term but also includes any area in which tourist-related businesses and facilities are located.

(b) The governing body of a municipality may designate any part of its extraterritorial jurisdiction as an industrial district and may treat the designated area in a manner considered by the governing body to be in the best interests of the municipality.

(c) The governing body may make written contracts with owners of land in the industrial district:

(1) to guarantee the continuation of the extraterritorial status of the district and its immunity from annexation by the municipality for a period not to exceed 15 years; and

(2) with other lawful terms and considerations that the parties agree to be reasonable, appropriate, and not unduly restrictive of business activities.

(d) The parties to a contract may renew or extend it for successive periods not to exceed 15 years each. In the event any owner of land in an industrial district is offered an opportunity to renew or extend a contract, then all owners of land in that industrial district must be offered an opportunity to renew or extend a contract subject to the provisions of Subsection (c).

(e) A municipality may provide for adequate fire-fighting services in the industrial district by:

(1) directly furnishing fire-fighting services that are to be paid for by the property owners of the district;

(2) contracting for fire-fighting services, whether or not all or a part of the services are to be paid for by the property owners of the district; or

(3) contracting with the property owners of the district to have them provide for their own fire-fighting services.

(f) A property owner who provides for his own fire-fighting services under this section may not be required to pay any part of the cost of the fire-fighting services provided by the municipality to other property owners in the district.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 975, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Sec. 42.045. CREATION OF POLITICAL SUBDIVISION IN INDUSTRIAL DISTRICT. (a) A political subdivision, one purpose of which is to provide services of a governmental or proprietary nature, may not be created in an industrial district designated under Section 42.044 by a municipality unless the municipality gives its written consent by ordinance or resolution. The municipality shall give or deny consent within 60 days after the date the municipality receives a written request for consent. Failure to give or deny consent in the allotted period constitutes the municipality's consent to the initiation of the creation proceedings.

(b) If the consent is obtained, the creation proceedings must be initiated within six months after the date of the consent and must be finally completed within 18 months after the date of the consent. Failure to comply with either time requirement terminates the consent for the proceedings.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 42.046. DESIGNATION OF A PLANNED UNIT DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT IN EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION. (a) The governing body of a municipality that has disannexed territory previously annexed for limited purposes may designate an area within its extraterritorial jurisdiction as a planned unit development district by written agreement with the owner of the land under Subsection (b). The agreement shall be recorded in the deed records of the county or counties in which the land is located. A planned unit development district designated under this section shall contain no less than 250 acres. If there are more than four owners of land to be designated as a single planned unit development, each owner shall appoint a single person to negotiate with the municipality and authorize that person to bind each owner for purposes of this section.

(b) An agreement governing the creation, development, and existence of a planned unit development district established under this section shall be between the governing body of the municipality and the owner of the land subject to the agreement. The agreement shall not be effective until signed by both parties and by any other person with an interest in the land, as that interest is evidenced by an instrument recorded in the deed records of the county or counties in which the land is located. The parties may agree:

(1) to guarantee continuation of the extraterritorial status of the planned unit development district and its immunity from annexation by the municipality for a period not to exceed 15 years after the effective date of the agreement;

(2) to authorize certain land uses and development within the planned unit development;

(3) to authorize enforcement by the municipality of certain municipal land use and development regulations within the planned unit development district, in the same manner such regulations are enforced within the municipality's boundaries, as may be agreed by the landowner and the municipality;

(4) to vary any watershed protection regulations;

(5) to authorize or restrict the creation of political subdivisions within the planned unit development district; and

(6) to such other terms and considerations the parties consider appropriate.

(c) The agreement between the governing body of the municipality and the owner of the land within the planned unit development district shall be binding upon all subsequent governing bodies of the municipality and subsequent owners of the land within the planned unit development district for the term of the agreement.

(d) An agreement or a decision made under this section and an action taken under the agreement by the parties to the agreement are not subject to an approval or an appeal brought under Section 26.177, Water Code.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 822, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 891, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1991.

Sec. 42.047. CREATION OF A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION IN AN AREA PROPOSED FOR A PLANNED UNIT DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT. If the governing body of a municipality that has disannexed territory previously annexed for limited purposes refuses to designate a planned unit development district under Section 42.046 no later than 180 days after the date a request for the designation is filed with the municipality by the owner of the land to be included in the planned unit development district, the municipality shall be considered to have given the consent required by Section 42.041 to the incorporation of a proposed municipality including within its boundaries all or some of such land. If consent to incorporation is granted by this subsection, the consenting municipality waives all rights to challenge the proposed incorporation in any court.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 822, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 42.049. AUTHORITY OF WELLS BRANCH MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT. (a) Wells Branch Municipal Utility district is authorized to contract with a municipality:

(1) to provide for payments to be made to the municipality for purposes that the governing body of the district determines will further regional cooperation between the district and the municipality; and

(2) to provide other lawful terms and considerations that the district and the municipality agree are reasonable and appropriate.

(b) A contract entered into under this section may be for a term that is mutually agreeable to the parties. The parties to such a contract may renew or extend the contract.

(c) A municipality may contract with the district to accomplish the purposes set forth in Subsection (a) of this section. In a contract entered into under this section, a municipality may agree that the district will remain in existence and be exempt from annexation by the municipality for the term of the contract.

(d) A contract entered into under this section will be binding on all subsequent governing bodies of the district and of the municipality for the term of the contract.

(e) The district may make annual appropriations from its operations and maintenance tax or other revenues lawfully available to the district to make payments to a municipality under a contract entered into under this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 926, Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER D. RELEASE OF AREA BY PETITION OF LANDOWNER OR RESIDENT FROM EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION

Sec. 42.101. APPLICABILITY. This subchapter does not apply to an area located:

(1) within five miles of the boundary of a military base, as defined by Section 43.0117, at which an active training program is conducted;

(2) in an area that was voluntarily annexed into the extraterritorial jurisdiction that is located in a county:

(A) in which the population grew by more than 50 percent from the previous federal decennial census in the federal decennial census conducted in 2020; and

(B) that has a population greater than 240,000;

(3) within the portion of the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality with a population of more than 1.4 million that is:

(A) within 15 miles of the boundary of a military base, as defined by Section 43.0117, at which an active training program is conducted; and

(B) in a county with a population of more than two million;

(4) in an area designated as an industrial district under Section 42.044; or

(5) in an area subject to a strategic partnership agreement entered into under Section 43.0751.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 106 (S.B. 2038), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 42.102. AUTHORITY TO FILE PETITION FOR RELEASE. (a) A resident of an area in a municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction may file a petition with the municipality in accordance with this subchapter for the area to be released from the extraterritorial jurisdiction.

(b) The owner or owners of the majority in value of an area consisting of one or more parcels of land in a municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction may file a petition with the municipality in accordance with this subchapter for the area to be released from the extraterritorial jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 106 (S.B. 2038), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 42.103. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW. Chapter 277, Election Code, applies to a petition requesting removal under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 106 (S.B. 2038), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 42.104. PETITION REQUIREMENTS. (a) A petition requesting release under this subchapter must be signed by:

(1) more than 50 percent of the registered voters of the area described by the petition as of the date of the preceding uniform election date; or

(2) a majority in value of the holders of title of land in the area described by the petition, as indicated by the tax rolls of the applicable central appraisal district.

(b) A person filing a petition under this subchapter must satisfy the signature requirement described by Subsection (a) not later than the 180th day after the date the first signature for the petition is obtained.

(c) A signature collected under this section must be in writing.

(d) The petition must include a map of the land to be released and describe the boundaries of the land to be released by:

(1) metes and bounds; or

(2) lot and block number, if there is a recorded map or plat.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 106 (S.B. 2038), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 42.105. RESULTS OF PETITION. (a) A petition requesting removal under this subchapter shall be verified by the municipal secretary or other person responsible for verifying signatures.

(b) The municipality shall notify the residents and landowners of the area described by the petition of the results of the petition. The municipality may satisfy this requirement by notifying the person who filed the petition under Section 42.102.

(c) If a resident or landowner obtains the number of signatures on the petition required under Section 42.104 to release the area from the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction, the municipality shall immediately release the area from the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction.

(d) If a municipality fails to take action to release the area under Subsection (c) by the later of the 45th day after the date the municipality receives the petition or the next meeting of the municipality's governing body that occurs after the 30th day after the date the municipality receives the petition, the area is released by operation of law.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, an area released from a municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction under this section may not be included in the extraterritorial jurisdiction or the corporate boundaries of a municipality, unless the owner or owners of the area subsequently request that the area be included in the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction or corporate boundaries.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 106 (S.B. 2038), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER E. RELEASE OF AREA BY ELECTION FROM EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION

Sec. 42.151. APPLICABILITY. This subchapter does not apply to an area located:

(1) within five miles of the boundary of a military base, as defined by Section 43.0117, at which an active training program is conducted;

(2) in an area that was voluntarily annexed into the extraterritorial jurisdiction that is located in a county:

(A) in which the population grew by more than 50 percent from the previous federal decennial census in the federal decennial census conducted in 2020; and

(B) that has a population greater than 240,000;

(3) within the portion of the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality with a population of more than 1.4 million that is:

(A) within 15 miles of the boundary of a military base, as defined by Section 43.0117, at which an active training program is conducted; and

(B) in a county with a population of more than two million;

(4) in an area designated as an industrial district under Section 42.044; or

(5) in an area subject to a strategic partnership agreement entered into under Section 43.0751.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 106 (S.B. 2038), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 42.152. AUTHORITY TO REQUEST ELECTION FOR RELEASE. (a) A resident of an area in a municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction may request the municipality to hold an election in accordance with this subchapter to vote on the question of whether to release the area from the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction by filing with the municipality a petition that includes the signatures of at least five percent of the registered voters residing in the area as of the date of the preceding uniform election date.

(b) A resident may not request another election on the question of releasing the same or substantially same area from the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction before the second anniversary of the date the municipality receives a petition filed under Subsection (a).

(c) The petition must include a map of the land to be released and describe the boundaries of the land to be released by:

(1) metes and bounds; or

(2) lot and block number, if there is a recorded map or plat.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 106 (S.B. 2038), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 42.153. ELECTION. (a) Except as provided by Section 42.156, a municipality shall order an election on the question of whether to release an area from the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction to be held on the first uniform election date that falls on or after the 90th day after the date the municipality receives a petition that complies with Section 42.152.

(b) The municipality shall hold the election ordered under this section in the area described by the petition at which the qualified voters of the area described by the petition may vote on the question of the release.

(c) An election ordered under this section must be held in the same manner as general elections of the municipality. The municipality shall pay for the costs of holding the election.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 106 (S.B. 2038), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 42.154. RESULTS OF ELECTION. (a) The governing body of a municipality shall canvass the election returns for an election held under this subchapter in accordance with Chapter 67, Election Code.

(b) Not later than 48 hours after the canvass of an election held under this subchapter, the municipality shall notify the residents of the area proposed to be released from the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction of the results of the election. The municipality may satisfy this requirement by notifying the person who filed the petition under Section 42.152.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 106 (S.B. 2038), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 42.155. RELEASE OF AREA AS RESULT OF ELECTION. (a) If at the election held under this subchapter a majority of qualified voters of the area to be released approve the proposed release, the municipality shall immediately release the area from the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction.

(b) If the municipality fails to take action to release the area under Subsection (a) by the later of the next meeting of the municipality's governing body or the 15th day after the canvass date for the election, the area is released by operation of law.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, an area released from a municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction under this section may not be included in the extraterritorial jurisdiction or the corporate boundaries of a municipality, unless the owner or owners of the area subsequently request that the area be included in the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction or corporate boundaries.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 106 (S.B. 2038), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 42.156. VOLUNTARY RELEASE. Instead of holding an election under Section 42.153, the municipality may voluntarily release the area for which the election is to be held from the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction before the date on which the election would have been held under Section 42.153(a).

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 106 (S.B. 2038), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER Z. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 42.901. APPORTIONMENT OF EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTIONS THAT OVERLAPPED ON AUGUST 23, 1963. (a) If, on August 23, 1963, the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality overlapped the extraterritorial jurisdiction of one or more other municipalities, the governing bodies of the affected municipalities may apportion the overlapped area by a written agreement approved by an ordinance or a resolution adopted by the governing bodies.

(b) A municipality having a claim of extraterritorial jurisdiction to the overlapping area may bring an action as plaintiff in the district court of the judicial district in which the largest municipality having a claim to the area is located. The plaintiff municipality must name as a defendant each municipality having a claim of extraterritorial jurisdiction to the area and must request the court to apportion the area among the affected municipalities. In apportioning the area, the court shall consider population densities, patterns of growth, transportation, topography, and land use in the municipalities and the overlapping area. The area must be apportioned among the municipalities:

(1) so that each municipality's part is contiguous to the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality or, if the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality is totally overlapped, is contiguous to the boundaries of the municipality;

(2) so that each municipality's part is in a substantially compact shape; and

(3) in the same ratio, to one decimal, that the respective populations of the municipalities bear to each other, but with each municipality receiving at least one-tenth of the area.

(c) An apportionment under this section must consider existing property lines. A tract of land or adjoining tracts of land that were under one ownership on August 23, 1963, and that do not exceed 160 acres may not be apportioned so as to be in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of more than one municipality unless the landowner gives written consent to that apportionment.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 42.902. RESTRICTION AGAINST IMPOSING TAX IN EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION. The inclusion of an area in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality does not by itself authorize the municipality to impose a tax in the area.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 42.9025. RESTRICTION ON IMPOSING FINE OR FEE IN CERTAIN AREAS IN EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION. (a) This section applies only to an area that is located in a municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction and:

(1) that has been disannexed from the municipality under Subchapter G, Chapter 43; or

(2) for which the municipality has attempted and failed to obtain consent for annexation under Subchapter C-4 or C-5, Chapter 43.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a municipality may not impose under a municipal ordinance a fine or fee on a person on the basis of:

(1) an activity that occurs wholly in an area described by Subsection (a); or

(2) the management or ownership of property located wholly in an area described by Subsection (a).

(c) This section does not limit a municipality, including a municipally owned retail water, wastewater, or drainage utility, from imposing in an area described by Subsection (a) a fine or fee, including through the adoption and enforcement of rates, for water, sewer, drainage, or other related utility services.

(d) This section does not apply to development or redevelopment in an area in which an election was held under Section 43.0117.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 386 (S.B. 1168), Sec. 1, eff. June 7, 2021.

Sec. 42.903. EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION OF CERTAIN TYPE B OR C GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITIES. (a) This section applies only to a Type B or C general-law municipality:

(1) that has more than 200 inhabitants;

(2) that is wholly surrounded, at the time of incorporation, by the extraterritorial jurisdiction of another municipality; and

(3) part of which was located, at any time before incorporation, in an area annexed for limited purposes by another municipality.

(b) The governing body of the municipality by resolution or ordinance may adopt an extraterritorial jurisdiction for all or part of the unincorporated area contiguous to the corporate boundaries of the municipality and located within one mile of those boundaries. The authority granted by this section is subject to the limitation provided by Section 26.178, Water Code.

(c) Within 90 days after the date the municipality adopts the resolution or ordinance, an owner of real property in the extraterritorial jurisdiction may petition the municipality to release the owner's property from the extraterritorial jurisdiction. On the presentation of the petition, the property:

(1) is automatically released from the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality and becomes part of the extraterritorial jurisdiction or limited purpose area of the municipality whose jurisdiction surrounded, on May 31, 1989, the municipality from whose jurisdiction the property is released; and

(2) becomes subject to any existing zoning or other land use approval provisions that applied to the property before the property was included in the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction under Subsection (b).

(d) The municipality may exercise in its extraterritorial jurisdiction the powers granted under state law to other municipalities in their extraterritorial jurisdiction, including the power to ensure its water supply and to carry out other public purposes.

(e) To the extent of any conflict, this section controls over other laws relating to the creation of extraterritorial jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 13.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 42.904. EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION AND VOTING RIGHTS IN CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES. (a) This section applies only to a municipality that has disannexed territory under Section 43.133 that it had previously annexed for limited purposes and that has extended rules to its extraterritorial jurisdiction under Section 212.003.

(b) The municipality shall allow all qualified voters residing in the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction to vote on any proposition that is submitted to the voters of the municipality and that involves:

(1) an adoption of or change to an ordinance or charter provision that would apply to the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction; or

(2) a nonbinding referendum that, if binding, would apply to the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 172, Sec. 1, eff. May 17, 1993.